Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
, the Governor, in consultation with the Chair of the Public Utility Commission and the Commissioner of Public Service or their designees, may waive the prohibitions contained in this section upon site preparation for or construction of an electric transmission facility or a generation facility necessary to ensure the stability or reliability of the electric system or a natural gas facility. Waivers issued under this subsection shall be subject to such conditions as are required by the Governor and shall be valid for the duration of the declared emergency plus 180 days or such lesser overall term as determined by the Governor. Upon the expiration of a waiver under this subsection, if a certificate of public good has not been issued under this section, the Commission shall require the removal, relocation, or alteration of the facilities, subject to the waiver, as the Commission finds will best promote the general good of the State.

(
l
)

Subsection (l) effective December 31, 2022; see also subsection (l) effective until December 31, 2022 set out above.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, and without limiting any existing authority of the Governor, and pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 9(10)

and (11), when the Governor has proclaimed a state of emergency pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 9, the Governor, in consultation with the Chair of the Public Utility Commission and the Commissioner of Public Service or their designees, may waive the prohibitions contained in this section upon site preparation for or construction of an electric transmission facility, a generation facility, or an energy storage facility as necessary to ensure the stability or reliability of the electric system or a natural gas facility. Waivers issued under this subsection shall be subject to such conditions as are required by the Governor and shall be valid for the duration of the declared emergency plus 180 days or such lesser overall term as determined by the Governor. Upon the expiration of a waiver under this subsection, if a certificate of public good has not been issued under this section, the Commission shall require the removal, relocation, or alteration of the facilities, subject to the waiver, as the Commission finds will best promote the general good of the State.

In any matter with respect to which the Commission considers the operation of a nuclear energy generating plant beyond the date permitted in any certificate of public good granted under this title, including any certificate in effect as of January 1, 2006, the Commission shall evaluate the application under current assumptions and analyses and not an extension of the cost benefit assumptions and analyses forming the basis of the previous certificate of public good for the operation of the facility.

No company as defined in section 201 of this title and no person as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 6001(14)

may place or allow the placement of wireless communications facilities on an electric transmission or generation facility located in this State, including a net metering system, without receiving a certificate of public good from the Public Utility Commission pursuant to this subsection. The Public Utility Commission may issue a certificate of public good for the placement of wireless communications facilities on electric transmission and generation facilities if such placement is in compliance with the criteria of this section and Commission rules or orders implementing this section. In developing such rules and orders, the Commission:
(n) (1) No company as defined in section 201 of this title and no person as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 6001(14)

may place or allow the placement of wireless communications facilities on an electric transmission or generation facility located in this State, including a net metering system, without receiving a certificate of public good from the Public Utility Commission pursuant to this subsection. The Public Utility Commission may issue a certificate of public good for the placement of wireless communications facilities on electric transmission and generation facilities if such placement is in compliance with the criteria of this section and Commission rules or orders implementing this section. In developing such rules and orders, the Commission:

may waive the requirements of this section that are not applicable to wireless telecommunication facilities, including criteria that are generally applicable to public service companies as defined in this title;

may modify notice and hearing requirements of this title as it deems appropriate;

shall seek to simplify the application and review process as appropriate; and

shall be aimed at furthering the State’s interest in ubiquitous mobile telecommunications and broadband service in the State.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection, if the Commission finds that a petition filed pursuant to this subsection does not raise a significant issue with respect to the criteria enumerated in subdivisions (b)(1), (3), (4), (5), and (8) of this section, the Commission shall issue a certificate of public good without a hearing. If the Commission fails to issue a final decision or identify a significant issue with regard to a completed petition made under this section within 60 days of its filing with the Clerk of the Commission and service to the Director of Public Advocacy for the Department of Public Service, the petition is deemed approved by operation of law. The rules required by this subsection shall be adopted within six months of the effective date of this section, and rules under this section may be adopted on an emergency basis to comply with the dates required by this section. As used in this subsection, “wireless communication facilities” include antennae, related equipment, and equipment shelter, but do not include equipment used by utilities exclusively for intra- and inter-utility communications.

The Commission shall not reject as incomplete a petition under this section for a wind generation facility on the grounds that the petition does not specify the exact make or dimensions of the turbines and rotors to be installed at the facility as long as the petition provides the maximum horizontal and vertical dimensions of those turbines and rotors and the maximum decibel level that the turbines and rotors will produce as measured at the nearest residential structure over a 12-hour period commencing at 7:00 p.m.

An in-state generation facility receiving a certificate under this section that produces electric energy using woody biomass shall annually disclose to the Commission the amount, type, and source of wood acquired to generate energy.

A certificate under this section shall be required for a plant using methane derived from an agricultural operation as follows:
(q) (1) A certificate under this section shall be required for a plant using methane derived from an agricultural operation as follows:

With respect to a plant that constitutes farming pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 6001(22)(F)

, only for the equipment used to generate electricity from biogas, the equipment used to refine biogas into natural gas, the structures housing such equipment used to generate electricity or refine biogas, and the interconnection to electric and natural gas distribution and transmission systems. The certificate shall not be required for the methane digester, the digester influents and non-gas effluents, the buildings and equipment used to handle such influents and non-gas effluents, or the on-farm use of heat and exhaust produced by the generation of electricity, and these components shall not be subject to jurisdiction under this section.

With respect to a plant that does not constitute farming pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 6001(22)(F)

but which receives feedstock from off-site farms, for all on-site components of the plant, for the transportation of feedstock to the plant from off-site contributing farms, and the transportation of effluent or digestate back to those farms. The certificate shall not regulate any farming activities conducted on the contributing farms that provide feedstock to a plant or use of effluent or digestate returned to the contributing farms from the plant.

Notwithstanding

1 V.S.A. § 214

and Commission Rule 5.408, if the Commission issued a certificate to a plant using methane derived from an agricultural operation prior to July 1, 2013, such certificate shall require an amendment only when there is a substantial change, pursuant to Commission Rule 5.408, to the equipment used to generate electricity from biogas, the equipment used to refine biogas into natural gas, the structures housing such equipment used to generate electricity or refine biogas, or the interconnection to electric and natural gas distribution and transmission systems. The Commission’s jurisdiction in any future proceedings concerning such a certificate shall be limited pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.

This subsection shall not affect the determination, under section 8005a of this title, of the price for a standard offer to a plant using methane derived from an agricultural operation.

As used in this section, “biogas” means a gas resulting from the action of microorganisms on organic material such as manure or food processing waste.

The Commission may provide that, in any proceeding under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section for the construction of a renewable energy plant, a demonstration of compliance with subdivision (b)(2) of this section, relating to establishing need for the plant, shall not be required if all or part of the electricity to be generated by the plant is under contract to one or more Vermont electric distribution companies and if no part of the plant is financed directly or indirectly through investments, other than power contracts, backed by Vermont electricity ratepayers. In this subsection, “plant” and “renewable energy” shall be as defined in section 8002 of this title.

This subsection sets minimum setback requirements that shall apply to in-state ground-mounted solar electric generation facilities approved under this section, unless the facility is installed on a canopy constructed on an area primarily used for parking vehicles that is in existence or permitted on the date the application for the facility is filed.

The minimum setbacks shall be:

from a State or municipal highway, measured from the edge of the traveled way:

100 feet for a facility with a plant capacity exceeding 150 kW; and

40 feet for a facility with a plant capacity less than or equal to 150 kW but greater than 15 kW.

From each property boundary that is not a State or municipal highway:

50 feet for a facility with a plant capacity exceeding 150 kW; and

25 feet for a facility with a plant capacity less than or equal to 150 kW but greater than 15 kW.

This subsection does not require a setback for a facility with a plant capacity equal to or less than 15 kW.

On review of an application, the Commission may:

require a larger setback than this subsection requires;

approve an agreement to a smaller setback among the applicant, the municipal legislative body, and each owner of property adjoining the smaller setback; or

require a setback for a facility constructed on an area primarily used for parking vehicles, if the application concerns such a facility.

In this subsection:

“kW” and “plant capacity” shall have the same meaning as in section 8002 of this title.

“Setback” means the shortest distance between the nearest portion of a solar panel or support structure for a solar panel, at its point of attachment to the ground, and a property boundary or the edge of a highway’s traveled way.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the law, primary agricultural soils as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 6001

located on the site of a solar electric generation facility approved under this section shall remain classified as such soils, and the review of any change in use of the site subsequent to the construction of the facility shall treat the soils as if the facility had never been constructed. Each certificate of public good issued by the Commission for a ground-mounted solar generation facility shall state the contents of this subsection.

Subsection (u) effective until December 31, 2022; see also subsection (u) effective December 31, 2022 set out below.

A certificate under this section shall only be required for an energy storage facility that has a capacity of 500 kW or greater.

(u)

Subsection (u) effective December 31, 2022; see also subsection (u) effective until December 31, 2022 set out above.

For an energy storage facility, a certificate under this section shall only be required for a stationary facility exporting to the grid that has a capacity of 100 kW or greater, unless the Commission establishes a larger threshold by rule. The Commission shall establish a simplified application process for energy storage facilities subject to this section with a capacity of up to 1 MW, unless it establishes a larger threshold by rule. For facilities eligible for this simplified application process, a certificate of public good will be issued by the Commission by the forty-sixth day following filing of a complete application, unless a substantive objection is timely filed with the Commission or the Commission itself raises an issue. The Commission may require facilities eligible for the simplified application process to include a letter from the interconnecting utility indicating the absence or resolution of interconnection issues as part of the application.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 69

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1969; amended

1969, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. March 24, 1970;

1971, No. 208

(Adj. Sess.), eff. March 31, 1972;

1975, No. 23

;

1977, No. 11

, §§ 1, 2;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1981, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.);

1983, No. 45

;

1985, No. 48

, § 1;

1987, No. 65

, § 1, eff. May 28, 1987;

1987, No. 67

, § 14;

1987, No. 273

(Adj. Sess.) § 1, eff. June 21, 1988;

1989, No. 256

(Adj. Sess.), § 10(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1991;

1991, No. 99

, §§ 3, 4;

1991, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6, 7;

1993, No. 21

, § 10, eff. May 12, 1993;

1993, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a, eff. May 19, 1994;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2003, No. 82

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 3;

2005, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 3;

2007, No. 79

, § 16, eff. June 9, 2007;

2009, No. 6

, §§ 1, 2, 3, eff. April 30, 2009;

2009, No. 45

, § 7, eff. May 27, 2009;

2009, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § F30;

2011, No. 47

, § 5;

2011, No. 62

, § 26;

2011, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 14, 2012;

2011, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 24

, § 4, eff. May 13, 2013;

2013, No. 88

, § 1;

2015, No. 23

, § 151;

2015, No. 40

, § 31;

2015, No. 51

, § F.9, eff. June 3, 2015;

2015, No. 56

, §§ 19, 20;

2015, No. 56

, §§ 26a, 26b, 26c, eff. June 11, 2015;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. June 13, 2016;

2017, No. 53

, §§ 1, 3, 4;

2017, No. 74

, § 125;

2017, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 31

, §§ 17, 25;

2021, No. 42

, § 6;

2021, No. 54

, § 9, eff. Dec. 31, 2022.

Particular cases.

Public Utility Commission did not err in finding that a solar net-metering system would not have an undue adverse effect, as any project-related sound impacts would be temporary, the project would not unduly interfere with the orderly development of the region in that regardless of whether an initial letter of support was signed by a majority, the selectboard and the planning commission had ratified their support for the project, there was evidence supporting the findings as to air pollution, greenhouse gas, wetlands, water supply, soil erosion, and transportation, and a construction staging area was not subject to setbacks. In re Acorn Energy Solar 2, LLC, 2021 VT 3, — Vt. —, 251 A.3d 899, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 5 (Vt. 2021).

In finding that a solar facility would have an undue adverse aesthetic impact and interfere with the orderly development of the region, the Public Utility Commission erred in relying on its conclusion that the project would violate a clear, written standard because the broad and general statements in local and regional plans about preserving the rural character of the entire Rural Conservation District were not sufficiently specific. In re Apple Hill Solar LLC, 2021 VT 69, — Vt. —, — A.3d —, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 92 (Vt. 2021).

Public Utility Commission (PUC) acted within its discretion in determining that a solar facility would interfere with orderly development and cause an undue adverse aesthetic effect because it would be prominently visible on a hillside, as the design standard was sufficiently specific, and the evidence supported the PUC’s findings as to visibility. In re Apple Hill Solar LLC, 2021 VT 69, — Vt. —, — A.3d —, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 92 (Vt. 2021).

Public Utility Commission’s use of the Quechee test was an appropriate exercise of its quasi-judicial authority in ruling on a certificate of public good petition for a solar facility, and it was not required to engage in rulemaking before applying this test. In re Apple Hill Solar LLC, 2021 VT 69, — Vt. —, — A.3d —, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 92 (Vt. 2021).

Review by the Public Utility Commission (PUC) of a proposed solar facility was entirely consistent with the statute imposing limitations on municipal bylaws. The PUC did not apply a local zoning ordinance or allow a local zoning board or bylaw to regulate the siting of the project here; the PUC made the final policy decision, as directed by the legislature and provided by the statutory scheme. In re Apple Hill Solar LLC, 2021 VT 69, — Vt. —, — A.3d —, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 92 (Vt. 2021).

Public Utility Commission did not err in finding that a net-metered solar electric-generation facility would have an adverse economic impact because it would add to an overburdened system, increase costs to ratepayers, and offer no relative benefits such as providing cleaner or more reliable generation. Furthermore, the historical reasons for the curtailment situation in the area were outside the scope of the proceeding. In re Derby GLC Solar, 2019 VT 77, 211 Vt. 144, 221 A.3d 777, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 147 (2019).

Applicant for a certificate of public good, which argued that the interpretation of the statute governing such certificates by the Public Utility Commission (PUC) conflicted with past agency interpretations of the statute, had not identified any previous PUC decisions to support this contention and therefore failed to meet its burden of showing that the PUC had inconsistently applied the statute. Furthermore, the PUC could consider changed circumstances in assessing whether new applications complied with a Comprehensive Energy Plan. In re Derby GLC Solar, 2019 VT 77, 211 Vt. 144, 221 A.3d 777, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 147 (2019).

Public Utility Commission (PUC) had not engaged in improper burden shifting in denying the applicant a certificate of public good. The record showed that the other parties presented evidence to support their position that the project would not advance the goals of the Comprehensive Energy Plan and would cause undue adverse impacts on Vermont utilities and ratepayers; the applicant essentially was arguing that the PUC should have accepted its version of the facts instead. In re Derby GLC Solar, 2019 VT 77, 211 Vt. 144, 221 A.3d 777, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 147 (2019).

Conclusion by the Public Utility Commission (PUC) that the proposed project would not unduly interfere with orderly development of the region rested on findings that did not support it. The select board’s decision not to oppose the project as violating the town plan, on which the PUC heavily relied, did not necessarily mean anything; in fact, the town had taken no position as to the project’s overall compliance with the town plan. In re Petition of Apple Hill Solar LLC, 2019 VT 64, 211 Vt. 54, 219 A.3d 1295, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 117 (2019), app. dismissed, — Vt. —, — A.3d —, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 118 (2020), app. dismissed, 2021 VT 92, — Vt. —, 274 A.3d 823, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 119 (2021).

Public Utility Commission erred in concluding that a project would not have an unduly adverse aesthetic effect, as the record did not support the threshold determination that the town plan did not constitute a clear, written community standard intended to protect aesthetics. The significance of the town’s decision not to oppose the project based on the town plan was minimal; counsel’s statements did not support a finding of inconsistent application of the town plan standards; and a town planner’s testimony did not support the finding of inconsistent application. In re Petition of Apple Hill Solar LLC, 2019 VT 64, 211 Vt. 54, 219 A.3d 1295, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 117 (2019), app. dismissed, — Vt. —, — A.3d —, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 118 (2020), app. dismissed, 2021 VT 92, — Vt. —, 274 A.3d 823, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 119 (2021).

The only way an applicant could start the streamlined certificate of public good approval process was by filing a registration form with the Public Utility Commission. Here, petitioner stipulated that it had installed at least 134 systems without first filing the appropriate registration forms; by failing to do so, petitioner failed to take advantage of the net-metering approval process and failed to obtain the necessary certificates of public good prior to beginning construction, in violation of the statute that prohibited any corporation from constructing a new electric-generation facility without first obtaining a certificate of public good, and a civil penalty was appropriate. In re Investigation into Solarcity Corp., 2019 VT 23, 210 Vt. 51, 210 A.3d 1255, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 49 (2019).

Failure to file registration forms for a net-metering system was not a clerical error, but was a substantive violation of the statute that prohibited any corporation from constructing a new electric-generation facility without first obtaining a certificate of public good. Accordingly, the Public Utility Commission did not err in finding a violation regardless of whether petitioner’s error was unintentional. In re Investigation into Solarcity Corp., 2019 VT 23, 210 Vt. 51, 210 A.3d 1255, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 49 (2019).

With regard to a certificate of public good for a solar electric generation facility, there was support, including an independent analysis by the Vermont Division for Historic Preservation, for the Public Service Board’s finding that the project would not have an undue adverse impact on historic sites. In re Petition of Rutland Renewable Energy, LLC, 2016 VT 50, 202 Vt. 59, 147 A.3d 621, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 51 (2016).

In granting a certificate of public good for a solar electric generation facility, the Public Service Board properly found that the project would not have an undue adverse impact on aesthetics, as setback requirements in the municipal plan and could not be considered a community standard because they would allow the town rather than the State to control solar generation and did not identify specific areas or resources for protection, the Board considered the neighbors’ perspective and required extensive screening to mitigate that impact, and the neighbors did not offer a fully formed proposal for an alternative setback requirement. In re Petition of Rutland Renewable Energy, LLC, 2016 VT 50, 202 Vt. 59, 147 A.3d 621, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 51 (2016).

In granting a certificate of public good for a solar electric generation facility, the Public Service Board properly found the assertion of regional impact inadequate and not persuasive, as there was no actual evidence of regional impact aside from a prediction of future replication. In re Petition of Rutland Renewable Energy, LLC, 2016 VT 50, 202 Vt. 59, 147 A.3d 621, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 51 (2016).

In awarding a certificate of public good to construct a wind-electric generation facility, the Public Service Board properly found that the project complied with noise standards to protect public health. The Board imposed absolute noise standards and required the implementation of a comprehensive noise-monitoring plan; its operating conditions effectively ensured that the project would comply with the Board’s sound standard, regardless of the precise accuracy of the noise-level estimates in the testimony. In re Joint Petition of Green Mountain Power Corp., 2012 VT 89, 192 Vt. 429, 60 A.3d 654, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 83 (2012).

In awarding a certificate of public good to construct a wind-electric generation facility, the Public Service Board acted well within its discretion in classifying a certain restriction as a technical error. It was readily apparent from the Board’s order that it approved up to a twenty-one turbine wind-generation facility and that it expressly approved a particular turbine model. In re Joint Petition of Green Mountain Power Corp., 2012 VT 89, 192 Vt. 429, 60 A.3d 654, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 83 (2012).

With regard to an application for a certificate of public good to construct a wind-electric generation facility, the record supported the Public Service Board’s finding that mitigation and decommissioning measures would limit the impacts of clearing to being adverse in nature, rather than unduly adverse. While it was true that at the time of his prefiled testimony, a witness believed that the impacts to these forests would be unduly adverse, he stated in his live testimony that the project’s effects on the two state-significant forest types had been mitigated such that they were adverse but not unduly so. In re Joint Petition of Green Mountain Power Corp., 2012 VT 89, 192 Vt. 429, 60 A.3d 654, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 83 (2012).

Towns failed to meet their burden of demonstrating that the Public Service Board violated their constitutional right to due process by not holding an evidentiary hearing on whether a utility’s efforts were sufficient to address the damage caused to easement parcels. The Board informed the parties in advance of the process to be followed, and it would create substantial procedural expense for the parties and for the Board to hold a full-blown technical hearing every time there was a post-certification claim that any number of conditions had not been complied with. In re Joint Petition of Green Mountain Power Corp., 2012 VT 89, 192 Vt. 429, 60 A.3d 654, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 83 (2012).

In determining whether a condition to granting a certificate of public good had been satisfied, the Public Service Board did not err in finding that remediation and mitigation were sufficient to counter the otherwise undue adverse impacts to the natural environment posed by the project. The Board concluded that a utility remediated the tree cutting activities on the original easement parcels to the fullest extent possible, and further that the additional conservation easements obtained as supplemental mitigation—when combined with the original easements subject to additional restrictions—would provide a greater degree of wildlife protection than the original easements alone. In re Joint Petition of Green Mountain Power Corp., 2012 VT 89, 192 Vt. 429, 60 A.3d 654, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 83 (2012).

Public Service Board properly denied towns’ motion to revoke a certificate of public good (CPG). The Board did not make the commencement of construction by a certain date a condition of the CPG, nor did it condition the CPG on a utility obtaining tax credits. In re Joint Petition of Green Mountain Power Corp., 2012 VT 89, 192 Vt. 429, 60 A.3d 654, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 83 (2012).

Public Service Board properly found that a solar energy farm would not have an “undue adverse effect” on aesthetics. The record, including testimony by a land-use planner about the project’s visibility and its consistency with town and county plans, supported its decision. In re Petition of Cross Pollination, 2012 VT 29, 191 Vt. 631, 47 A.3d 1285, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 27 (2012) (mem.).

Public Service Board’s determination that the general good would not be promoted unless approval of a project was conditioned upon the requirement that the applicant make further efforts to enter into stably priced contracts with Vermont utilities did not detract from its explicit finding that the project demonstrated economic benefits. The promotion of the general good of the State can plainly encompass the potential for even greater economic benefit from taking advantage of a particular efficiency, such as a sustainable no-cost fuel source, as envisioned by the Board’s decision. In re Amended Petition of UPC Vt. Wind, LLC, 2009 VT 19, 185 Vt. 296, 969 A.2d 144, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2009).

Given a project’s not insignificant impacts, it was fully within the Public Service Board’s purview to condition approval on the applicant making further efforts to exploit its advantage to reach stably priced contracts for the sale of electricity insulated from market fluctuations so as to enhance the project’s benefit to the utility ratepayers at large. In imposing this requirement, the Board did not ignore a substantive issue mandated by statute for consideration; instead, it fulfilled its statutory mandate, finding that the project, with conditions, satisfied the applicable statutory requirements, provided benefits greater than its adverse impacts, and, accordingly, promoted the general good of the state. In re Amended Petition of UPC Vt. Wind, LLC, 2009 VT 19, 185 Vt. 296, 969 A.2d 144, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2009).

Public Service Board did not err in finding that a project would not unduly interfere with the orderly development of the region. The Board acknowledged that the project was inconsistent with some provisions in the regional plan, but found that the plan did not prohibit the project and, in fact, that it encouraged development of wind power; the plan did not prohibit the development of commercial-scale wind energy; and it was not unreasonable for the Board to find that the project would affect only a small portion of the land designated as rural under the regional plan. In re Amended Petition of UPC Vt. Wind, LLC, 2009 VT 19, 185 Vt. 296, 969 A.2d 144, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2009).

It is elemental that each case turns on its own facts, and determining the degree of adverse aesthetic effect is a matter of weighing the evidence, a role for the Public Service Board rather than for the court. Because the Board applied the appropriate standard in evaluating the aesthetic impact of a project, its conclusion was supported by its findings, and its findings were supported by the record, the court would not disturb the Board’s assessment of the weight of the evidence on appeal. In re Amended Petition of UPC Vt. Wind, LLC, 2009 VT 19, 185 Vt. 296, 969 A.2d 144, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2009).